Massachusetts, session 194th, H918.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter xx, the following
Section:
(a) There shall be created a 6 member advisory panel which shall consist of the following
members or their designees: one member from the office of the secretary of energy and
environmental affairs with an expertise in geographic information systems (GIS); two members,
one appointed by the President of the Senate and one appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, with knowledge of ecology, ecosystems, forestry and biodiversity and/or from
the office of the State Geologist; one member from Community Land & Water Coalition or their
designee; one expert in hydrology nominated by the University of Massachusetts and appointed
by the Governor; and one Indigenous person with expertise in Indigenous and environmental
justice issues.
of 2

(b) The panel shall serve in an advisory capacity only and shall meet monthly or more
frequently in public meetings to investigate the scope and scale of sand mining.
(c) The investigation shall address sand mining in the Commonwealth including (1) the
current and potential impact on drinking water; (2) impact on Environmental Justice
communities; (3) climate change mitigation and resilience; (4) air pollution including worker and
public exposure to respirable crystalline silica from sand mines.
(d) Said investigation shall conclude within two years and include recommendations for
regulatory changes to protect drinking water, worker and public health, and the environment.
Said changes may include changes to licensing laws for mining, Part I, Title II, Chapter 21B,
Section 5 of the General Laws.
of 2